Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 PUBLIC SAFETY APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin PUBLIC SAFETYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,314,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Criminal Apprehension new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin Minnesota Clearance Grant Program new text end new text begin $1,000,000 the second year is for the Minnesota clearance grant program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Office of Justice Programs new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 214,000 new text end new text begin Task Force on Improving Responses to Domestic Violence Crimes new text end new text begin $214,000 the second year is for the Task Force on Improving Responses to Domestic Violence Crimes. The base for this appropriation is $100,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $0 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administration new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin Task Force on Standardized Identification for Emergency Responders new text end new text begin $100,000 the second year is for the Task Force on Standardized Identification for Emergency Responders. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin CORRECTIONSnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 13,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Incarceration and Prerelease Services new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 13,000 new text end new text begin Incarceration and Prerelease Services Base Budget new text end new text begin The base for incarceration and prerelease services is increased by $61,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $98,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin MINNESOTA VICTIMS OF CRIME ACCOUNT; TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $12,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is transferred from the general fund to the Minnesota victims of crime account in the special revenue fund established under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.708. This is a onetime transfer. new text end Sec. 5. Laws 2023, chapter 52, article 2, section 3, subdivision 8, as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 69, section 12, Laws 2024, chapter 123, article 1, section 11, Laws 2024, chapter 123, article 9, section 3, and Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, section 24, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Office of Justice Programs 94,758,000 80,434,000 Appropriations by Fund General 94,662,000 80,338,000 State Government Special Revenue 96,000 96,000 (a) Domestic and Sexual Violence Housing $1,500,000 each year is to establish a Domestic Violence Housing First grant program to provide resources for survivors of violence to access safe and stable housing and for staff to provide mobile advocacy and expertise in housing resources in their community and a Minnesota Domestic and Sexual Violence Transitional Housing program to develop and support medium to long term transitional housing for survivors of domestic and sexual violence with supportive services. The base for this appropriation is $1,000,000 beginning in fiscal year 2026. (b) Federal Victims of Crime Funding Gap $11,000,000 each year is to fund services for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, child abuse, and other crimes. This is a onetime appropriation. (c) Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and Girls $1,248,000 each year is to establish and maintain the Minnesota Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and Girls. (d) Increased Staffing $667,000 the first year and $1,334,000 the second year are to increase staffing in the Office of Justice Programs for grant monitoring and compliance; provide training and technical assistance to grantees and potential grantees; conduct community outreach and engagement to improve the experiences and outcomes of applicants, grant recipients, and crime victims throughout Minnesota; expand the Minnesota Statistical Analysis Center; and increase staffing for the crime victim reimbursement program and the Crime Victim Justice Unit. (e) Office of Restorative Practices $500,000 each year is to establish and maintain the Office of Restorative Practices. (f) Crossover and Dual-Status Youth Model Grants $1,000,000 each year is to provide grants to local units of government to initiate or expand crossover youth practices model and dual-status youth programs that provide services for youth who are involved with or at risk of becoming involved with both the child welfare and juvenile justice systems, in accordance with the Robert F. Kennedy National Resource Center for Juvenile Justice model. This is a onetime appropriation.new text begin This appropriation is available until December 15, 2026.new text end (g) Restorative Practices Initiatives Grants $4,000,000 each year is for grants to establish and support restorative practices initiatives pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.95, subdivision 6, and for a restitution grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.955. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. The base for this appropriation is $2,500,000 beginning in fiscal year 2026. (h) Ramsey County Youth Treatment Homes Acquisition and Betterment $5,000,000 the first year is for a grant to Ramsey County to establish, with input from community stakeholders, including impacted youth and families, up to seven intensive trauma-informed therapeutic treatment homes in Ramsey County that are licensed by the Department of Human Services, that are culturally specific, that are community-based, and that can be secured. These residential spaces must provide intensive treatment and intentional healing for youth as ordered by the court as part of the disposition of a case in juvenile court. This appropriation is available through June 30, 2027. (i) Ramsey County Violence Prevention $5,000,000 the first year is for a grant to Ramsey County to award grants to develop new and further enhance existing community-based organizational support through violence prevention and community wellness grants. Grantees must use the money to create family support groups and resources to support families during the time a young person is placed out of home following a juvenile delinquency adjudication and support the family through the period of postplacement reentry; create community-based respite options for conflict or crisis de-escalation to prevent incarceration or further systems involvement for families; or establish additional meaningful employment opportunities for systems-involved youth. This appropriation is available through June 30, 2027. (j) Office for Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives $274,000 each year is for increased staff and operating costs of the Office for Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives, the Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives Advisory Board, and the Gaagige-Mikwendaagoziwag reward advisory group. (k) Youth Intervention Programs $3,525,000 the first year and $3,526,000 the second year are for youth intervention programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.73. The base for this appropriation is $3,526,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,525,000 in fiscal year 2027. (l) Community Crime Intervention and Prevention Grants $750,000 each year is for community crime intervention and prevention program grants, authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.296. This is a onetime appropriation. (m) Resources for Victims of Crime $1,000,000 each year is for general crime victim grants to meet the needs of victims of crime not covered by domestic violence, sexual assault, or child abuse services. This is a onetime appropriation. (n) Prosecutor Training $100,000 each year is for a grant to the Minnesota County Attorneys Association to be used for prosecutorial and law enforcement training, including trial school training and train-the-trainer courses. All training funded with grant proceeds must contain blocks of instruction on racial disparities in the criminal justice system, collateral consequences to criminal convictions, and trauma-informed responses to victims. This is a onetime appropriation. The Minnesota County Attorneys Association must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety policy and finance on the training provided with grant proceeds, including a description of each training and the number of prosecutors and law enforcement officers who received training. The report is due by February 15, 2025. The report may include trainings scheduled to be completed after the date of submission with an estimate of expected participants. (o) Minnesota Heals $500,000 each year is for the Minnesota Heals grant program. This is a onetime appropriation. (p) Sexual Assault Exam Costs $3,967,000 the first year and $3,767,000 the second year are to reimburse qualified health care providers for the expenses associated with medical examinations administered to victims of criminal sexual conduct as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 609.35, and for costs to administer the program. The base for this appropriation is $3,771,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,776,000 in fiscal year 2027. (q) First Responder Mental Health Curriculum $75,000 each year is for a grant to the Adler graduate school. The grantee must use the grant to develop a curriculum for a 24-week certificate to train licensed therapists to understand the nuances, culture, and stressors of the work environments of first responders to allow those therapists to provide effective treatment to first responders in distress. The grantee must collaborate with first responders who are familiar with the psychological, cultural, and professional issues of their field to develop the curriculum and promote it upon completion. The grantee may provide the program online. The grantee must seek to recruit additional participants from outside the 11-county metropolitan area. The grantee must create a resource directory to provide law enforcement agencies with names of counselors who complete the program and other resources to support law enforcement professionals with overall wellness. The grantee shall collaborate with the Department of Public Safety and law enforcement organizations to promote the directory. This is a onetime appropriation. (r) Pathways to Policing $400,000 each year is for reimbursement grants to state and local law enforcement agencies that operate pathway to policing programs. Applicants for reimbursement grants may receive up to 50 percent of the cost of compensating and training program participants. Reimbursement grants shall be proportionally allocated based on the number of grant applications approved by the commissioner. This is a onetime appropriation. (s) Direct Assistance to Crime Victim Survivors $5,000,000 each year is to provide grants for direct services and advocacy for victims of sexual assault, general crime, domestic violence, and child abuse. Funding must support the direct needs of organizations serving victims of crime by providing: direct client assistance to crime victims; competitive wages for direct service staff; hotel stays and other housing-related supports and services; culturally responsive programming; prevention programming, including domestic abuse transformation and restorative justice programming; and for other needs of organizations and crime victim survivors. Services funded must include services for victims of crime in underserved communities most impacted by violence and reflect the ethnic, racial, economic, cultural, and geographic diversity of the state. The office shall prioritize culturally specific programs, or organizations led and staffed by persons of color that primarily serve communities of color, when allocating funds. (t) Racially Diverse Youth $250,000 each year is for grants to organizations to address racial disparity of youth using shelter services in the Rochester and St. Cloud regional areas. Of this amount, $125,000 each year is to address this issue in the Rochester area and $125,000 each year is to address this issue in the St. Cloud area. A grant recipient shall establish and operate a pilot program connected to shelter services to engage in community intervention outreach, mobile case management, family reunification, aftercare, and follow up when family members are released from shelter services. A pilot program must specifically address the high number of racially diverse youth that enter shelters in the regions. This is a onetime appropriation. (u) Violence Prevention Project Research Center $500,000 each year is for a grant to the Violence Prevention Project Research Center, operating as a 501(c)(3) organization, for research focused on reducing violence in society that uses data and analysis to improve criminal justice-related policy and practice in Minnesota. Research must place an emphasis on issues related to deaths and injuries involving firearms. This is a onetime appropriation. Beginning January 15, 2025, the Violence Prevention Project Research Center must submit an annual report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety policy and finance on its work and findings. The report must include a description of the data reviewed, an analysis of that data, and recommendations to improve criminal justice-related policy and practice in Minnesota with specific recommendations to address deaths and injuries involving firearms. (v) Report on Approaches to Address Illicit Drug Use in Minnesota $118,000 each year is to enter into an agreement with Rise Research LLC for a study and set of reports on illicit drug use in Minnesota describing current responses to that use, reviewing alternative approaches utilized in other jurisdictions, and making policy and funding recommendations for a holistic and effective response to illicit drug use and the illicit drug trade. The agreement must establish a budget and schedule with clear deliverables. This appropriation is onetime. The study must include a review of current policies, practices, and funding; identification of alternative approaches utilized effectively in other jurisdictions; and policy and funding recommendations for a response to illicit drug use and the illicit drug trade that reduces and, where possible, prevents harm and expands individual and community health, safety, and autonomy. Recommendations must consider impacts on public safety, racial equity, accessibility of health and ancillary supportive social services, and the intersections between drug policy and mental health, housing and homelessness, overdose and infectious disease, child welfare, and employment. Rise Research may subcontract and coordinate with other organizations or individuals to conduct research, provide analysis, and prepare the reports required by this section. Rise Research shall submit reports to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety finance and policy, human services finance and policy, health finance and policy, and judiciary finance and policy. Rise Research shall submit an initial report by February 15, 2024, and a final report by March 1, 2025. (w) Legal Representation for Children $150,000 each year is for a grant to an organization that provides legal representation for children in need of protection or services and children in out-of-home placement. The grant is contingent upon a match in an equal amount from nonstate funds. The match may be in kind, including the value of volunteer attorney time, in cash, or a combination of the two. These appropriations are in addition to any other appropriations for the legal representation of children. This appropriation is onetime. (x) Pretrial Release Study and Report $250,000 each year are for a grant to the Minnesota Justice Research Center to study and report on pretrial release practices in Minnesota and other jurisdictions, including but not limited to the use of bail as a condition of pretrial release. This appropriation is onetime. (y) Intensive Comprehensive Peace Officer Education and Training Program $5,000,000 the first year is to implement the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program described in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.8516. This appropriation is available through June 30, 2027. (z) Youth Services Office $250,000 each year is to operate the Youth Services Office. Sec. 6. Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, section 4, is amended to read: Sec. 4. PEACE OFFICER STANDARDS AND TRAINING (POST) BOARD $ deleted text begin 11,691,000 deleted text end new text begin 12,749,000 new text end $ deleted text begin 11,739,000 deleted text end new text begin 12,797,000 new text end (a) Peace Officer Training Reimbursements $2,949,000 each year is for reimbursements to local governments for peace officer training costs. (b) Philando Castile Memorial Training Fund deleted text begin $4,942,000deleted text end new text begin $6,000,000new text end each year is to support and strengthen law enforcement training and implement best practices. This funding shall be named the "Philando Castile Memorial Training Fund." These funds may only be used to reimburse costs related to training courses that qualify for reimbursement under Minnesota Statutes, sections 626.8452 (use of force), 626.8469 (training in crisis response, conflict management, and cultural diversity), and 626.8474 (autism training). Each sponsor of a training course is required to include the following in the sponsor's application for approval submitted to the board: course goals and objectives; a course outline including at a minimum a timeline and teaching hours for all courses; instructor qualifications; and a plan for learning assessments of the course and documenting the assessments to the board during review. Upon completion of each course, instructors must submit student evaluations of the instructor's teaching to the sponsor. The board shall keep records of the applications of all approved and denied courses. All continuing education courses shall be reviewed after the first year. The board must set a timetable for recurring review after the first year. For each review, the sponsor must submit its learning assessments to the board to show that the course is teaching the learning outcomes that were approved by the board. A list of licensees who successfully complete the course shall be maintained by the sponsor and transmitted to the board following the presentation of the course and the completed student evaluations of the instructors. Evaluations are available to chief law enforcement officers. The board shall establish a data retention schedule for the information collected in this section. Each year, if funds are available after reimbursing all eligible requests for courses approved by the board under this deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end , the board may use the funds to reimburse law enforcement agencies for other board-approved law enforcement training courses. new text begin Any unexpended balance of the appropriation in the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. new text end The base for this activity is $878,000 beginning in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, section 9, is amended to read: Sec. 9. OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION $ 250,000 $ -0- Use of Force Training $250,000 the first year is to provide reimbursement grants to eligible postsecondary schools certified to provide programs of professional peace officer education for providing in-service training programs on the use of force, including deadly force, by peace officers. Of this amount, up to 2.5 percent is for administration and monitoring of the program.new text begin This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027.new text end To be eligible for reimbursement, training offered by a postsecondary school must: (1) satisfy the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 626.8452, and be approved by the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training; (2) utilize scenario-based training that simulates real-world situations and involves the use of real firearms that fire nonlethal ammunition; (3) include a block of instruction on the physical and psychological effects of stress before, during, and after a high-risk or traumatic incident and the cumulative impact of stress on the health of officers; (4) include blocks of instruction on de-escalation methods and tactics, bias motivation, unknown risk training, defensive tactics, and force-on-force training; and (5) be offered to peace officers at no charge to the peace officer or law enforcement agency. An eligible postsecondary school may apply for reimbursement for the costs of offering the training. Reimbursement shall be made at a rate of $450 for each officer who completes the training. The postsecondary school must submit the name and peace officer license number of the peace officer who received the training to the Office of Higher Education. As used in this section: (1) "law enforcement agency" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f); and (2) "peace officer" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 2 PUBLIC SAFETY Section 1. new text begin [169.981] SALE OR TRANSFER OF LAW ENFORCEMENT VEHICLE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin As used in this section, "law enforcement vehicle" means a vehicle owned or leased by a state or local law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) A person must not sell or transfer a law enforcement vehicle to the public unless the person first removes any equipment or insignia that could mislead a reasonable person to believe that the vehicle is a law enforcement vehicle, including any: new text end new text begin (1) emergency lights; new text end new text begin (2) sirens; new text end new text begin (3) amber warning lights; new text end new text begin (4) grill lights; new text end new text begin (5) emblems; or new text end new text begin (6) outlines of emblems. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements in paragraph (a) do not apply to a sale or transfer to the federal government, a state, or a political subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Certificate of compliance. new text end new text begin (a) Before consummating a sale or transfer of a law enforcement vehicle that is subject to subdivision 2, paragraph (a), the vehicle owner must provide a certificate of compliance to the buyer or transferee confirming that the vehicle has had the law enforcement equipment and insignia removed. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety must design a standard certificate of compliance form and make the form publicly available without fee on the department's publicly accessible website using existing appropriations. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin (a) A person who sells or transfers a law enforcement vehicle to the public in violation of this section is liable for: new text end new text begin (1) damages proximately caused by the use of that vehicle during the commission of a crime; and new text end new text begin (2) a civil penalty of $2,500. new text end new text begin (b) Civil penalties collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the Minnesota victims of crime account created in section 299A.708. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin A county or city attorney may bring an action to recover the civil penalty established under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Sales or transfers of law enforcement vehicles to members of the public for the purpose of collection or display are exempt from the requirements of this section if the vehicle is owned and operated solely as a collector's item and not for general transportation purposes and is registered under section 168.10, subdivision 1a, 1b, 1c, 1d, 1g, or 1h. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Carcinogen. new text end new text begin "Carcinogen" means an agent that is: (1) classified by the International Agency for Research on Cancer under Group 1 or Group 2A; and (2) reasonably linked to an exposure-related cancer. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Exposure-related cancer. new text end new text begin "Exposure-related cancer" means only the following: new text end new text begin (1) bladder cancer; new text end new text begin (2) brain cancer; new text end new text begin (3) breast cancer; new text end new text begin (4) cervical cancer; new text end new text begin (5) colon cancer; new text end new text begin (6) colorectal cancer; new text end new text begin (7) esophageal cancer; new text end new text begin (8) kidney cancer; new text end new text begin (9) leukemia; new text end new text begin (10) lung cancer; new text end new text begin (11) malignant melanoma; new text end new text begin (12) mesothelioma; new text end new text begin (13) multiple myeloma; new text end new text begin (14) non-Hodgkin lymphoma; new text end new text begin (15) ovarian cancer; new text end new text begin (16) prostate cancer; new text end new text begin (17) skin cancer; new text end new text begin (18) stomach cancer; new text end new text begin (19) testicular cancer; and new text end new text begin (20) thyroid cancer. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Killed in the line of duty. (a) "Killed in the line of duty" does not include deaths from natural causes, except as new text begin expressly new text end provided in this subdivision. In the case of a public safety officer, killed in the line of duty includes the death of a public safety officer caused by accidental means while the public safety officer is acting in the course and scope of duties as a public safety officer. Killed in the line of duty also means if a public safety officer dies as the direct and proximate result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture, that officer shall be presumed to have died as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained in the line of duty if: (1) that officer, while on duty: (i) engaged in a situation, and that engagement involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical new text begin activity in new text end law enforcement, fire suppression, rescue, hazardous material response, emergency medical services, prison security, disaster relief, or other emergency response activity; or (ii) participated in a training exercise, and that participation involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity; (2) that officer died as a result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture suffered: (i) while engaging or participating under clause (1); (ii) while still on duty after engaging or participating under clause (1); or (iii) not later than 24 hours after engaging or participating under clause (1); and (3) the presumption is not overcome by competent medical evidence to the contrary. (b) deleted text begin "deleted text end Killed in the line of dutydeleted text begin "deleted text end also deleted text begin means that the officerdeleted text end new text begin includes a public safety officer who new text end died due to suicide: (1) secondary to a diagnosis of posttraumatic stress disorder as described in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association; or (2) within 45 days of the end of exposure, while on duty, to a traumatic event. new text begin (c) Killed in the line of duty also includes the death of a public safety officer as a result of complications caused by exposure sustained in the line of duty to any of the following infectious diseases, viruses, or bacteria, if medical records identify the disease, virus, or bacteria as a cause of or contributing factor to the death: COVID-19, influenza, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, tuberculosis, HIV/AIDS, meningitis, MRSA, whooping cough, or streptococcus pneumoniae. new text end new text begin (d) Killed in the line of duty also means a public safety officer shall be presumed to have been killed in the line of duty if the officer died from an exposure-related cancer that was a result of exposure to a carcinogen when: new text end new text begin (1) the exposure occurred while the public safety officer was acting in the course and scope of duties as a public safety officer; new text end new text begin (2) the public safety officer began serving as a public safety officer not less than five years before the date of the public safety officer's diagnosis of exposure-related cancer; new text end new text begin (3) the public safety officer was diagnosed with exposure-related cancer not more than 15 years after the public safety officer's last date of active service as a public safety officer; and new text end new text begin (4) the exposure-related cancer directly and proximately results in the death of the public safety officer. new text end new text begin (e) The presumption under paragraph (d) does not apply if competent medical evidence establishes that the exposure of the public safety officer to the carcinogen was not a substantial contributing factor in the death of the public safety officer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Nonroutine strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine strenuous physical activity" means line of duty activity that: new text end new text begin (1) is not an action of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature; new text end new text begin (2) is not performed as a matter of routine; and new text end new text begin (3) entails an unusually high level of physical exertion. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity" means nonroutine stressful physical activity or nonroutine strenuous physical activity. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Nonroutine stressful physical activity. new text end new text begin "Nonroutine stressful physical activity" means line of duty activity that: new text end new text begin (1) is not an action of a clerical, administrative, or nonmanual nature; new text end new text begin (2) is not performed as a matter of routine; new text end new text begin (3) entails nonnegligible physical exertion; and new text end new text begin (4) occurs: new text end new text begin (i) with respect to a situation in which a public safety officer is engaged under circumstances that objectively and reasonably: new text end new text begin (A) pose or appear to pose significant dangers, threats, or hazards, or reasonably foreseeable risks thereof, not faced by similarly situated members of the public in the ordinary course; and new text end new text begin (B) provoke, cause, or occasion an unusually high level of alarm, fear, or anxiety; or new text end new text begin (ii) with respect to a training exercise in which a public safety officer participates under circumstances that objectively and reasonably: new text end new text begin (A) simulate in realistic fashion situations that pose significant dangers, threats, or hazards; and new text end new text begin (B) provoke, cause, or occasion an unusually high level of alarm, fear, or anxiety. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Public safety officer. "Public safety officer" includes: (1) a peace officer defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c) or (d); (2) a correction officer employed at a correctional facility and charged with maintaining the safety, security, discipline, and custody of inmates at the facility; (3) a corrections staff person working in a public agency and supervising offenders in the community as defined in sections 243.05, subdivision 6; 244.19, subdivision 1; and 401.01, subdivision 2; (4) an individual employed on a full-timenew text begin or part-timenew text end basis by the state or by a fire department of a governmental subdivision of the state, who is engaged in any of the following duties: (i) firefighting; (ii) emergency motor vehicle operation; (iii) investigation into the cause and origin of fires; (iv) the provision of emergency medical services; or (v) hazardous material responder; (5) a legally enrolled member of a volunteernew text begin or paid on-callnew text end fire department or member of an independent nonprofit firefighting corporation who is engaged in the hazards of firefighting; (6) a good samaritan while complying with the request or direction of a public safety officer to assist the officer; (7) a reserve police officer or a reserve deputy sheriff while acting under the supervision and authority of a political subdivision; (8) a driver or attendant with a licensed basic or advanced life-support transportation service who is engaged in providing emergency care; (9) a first responder who is certified by the director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services to perform basic emergency skills before the arrival of a licensed ambulance service and who is a member of an organized service recognized by a local political subdivision to respond to medical emergencies to provide initial medical care before the arrival of an ambulance; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (10) a person, other than a state trooper, employed by the commissioner of public safety and assigned to the State Patrol, whose primary employment duty is either Capitol security or the enforcement of commercial motor vehicle laws and regulationsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (11) a person formerly employed as a public safety officer under clauses (1) to (5) or (7) to (10) if the person separated from service due to a duty disability, as defined in section 353.01, subdivision 41. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [299A.412] DETERMINING WHAT IS ROUTINE. new text end new text begin Neither of the following is dispositive in determining whether an activity or action is understood to have been performed as a matter of routine under section 299A.41: new text end new text begin (1) being generally described by the public safety agency as routine or ordinary; or new text end new text begin (2) the frequency with which the activity or action may be performed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [299A.413] EXPOSURE-RELATED CANCER CLAIMS. new text end new text begin (a) An individual may file a claim that is predicated upon a public safety officer's line of duty death that is the direct and proximate result of an exposure-related cancer if the death occurred on or after January 1, 2020. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person eligible to file a claim for an exposure-related cancer line of duty death of a public safety officer that occurred after January 1, 2020, but before final enactment of this act, has three years from the date of final enactment of this act to file the claim. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.45, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Award amount. (a) The amount of the award is the lesser of: (1) the average tuition and fees charged by the institution; or (2) the tuition maximums established by law for the state grant program under section 136A.121. The tuition maximum for graduate study is the maximum established by law for the state grant program for four-year programs. (b) An award under this subdivision must not affect a recipient's eligibility for a state grant under section 136A.121. (c) For the purposes of this subdivision, "fees" include only those fees that are mandatory and charged to all students attending the institution. (d) For the purpose of benefits awarded under this section, "full time" for a graduate program is eight or more credits per term or the equivalent. new text begin (e) If there are insufficient funds appropriated for this purpose, the commissioner shall determine the award amounts for each eligible applicant from available resources. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin TASK FORCE ON IMPROVING RESPONSES TO DOMESTIC VIOLENCE CRIMES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Task Force on Improving Responses to Domestic Violence Crimes is established to review law enforcement, prosecutorial, and community responses to domestic violence crimes and make policy and funding recommendations to the legislature to improve those responses and increase public safety. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must invite individuals with lived domestic violence experience and representatives from city and county prosecuting agencies, Violence Free Minnesota, Mending the Sacred Hoop, other statewide crime victim coalitions, organizations that advocate for or provide direct services to victims of domestic violence, organizations that provide domestic abuse transformation programming, the Minnesota judicial branch, the Minnesota Board of Public Defense, the Minnesota Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers, the Department of Health, the Department of Public Safety, the Office of Justice Programs, the Office for Missing and Murdered Indigenous Relatives, the Office for Missing and Murdered Black Women and Girls, local law enforcement agencies, Tribal governments, and other interested parties to participate in the task force. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must ensure that the membership of the task force is balanced among the various representatives, reflects a broad spectrum of viewpoints, reflects the geographic diversity of the state, and is inclusive of marginalized communities as well as victim and survivor voices. new text end new text begin (c) Members serve at the pleasure of the commissioner of public safety or until the task force expires. The commissioner may fill vacancies consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member invited to participate in the task force. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force serve without compensation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Officers; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee must convene the first meeting of the task force by September 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) At the first meeting, the members of the task force must elect a chair and may elect other officers as the members deem necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force must meet monthly or as determined by the chair. The task force must meet frequently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. new text end new text begin (d) Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must review current practices related to cases of domestic violence and recommend policies, training, statutory changes, and funding to make investigations more effective, support and protect victims, improve prosecutions, and increase awareness of issues connected to domestic violence throughout the criminal justice system. new text end new text begin (b) The task force's first responsibility must be to develop a model policy on the use of lethality assessments by peace officers and recommend training for peace officers, law enforcement agencies, and others regarding the use of lethality assessments. The model policy must require peace officers interviewing a victim of domestic abuse to assess the potential danger to the victim and recommend specific actions for peace officers to take if the results of the assessment indicate the victim is in need of immediate protection or services. The model policy may include a lethality assessment form for use by peace officers. new text end new text begin (c) At a minimum, the task force must: new text end new text begin (1) review current training related to domestic violence cases that is provided to 911 telecommunicators, peace officers, social workers, prosecuting attorneys, and judges; new text end new text begin (2) develop updated training guidelines and establish recommendations for regular review of those guidelines; new text end new text begin (3) review current practices for interviewing victims of domestic violence, children who are victims or witnesses of domestic violence, and other witnesses; new text end new text begin (4) make recommendations for improved interviewing practices, including policies for following up on interviews and providing protection and support for witnesses; new text end new text begin (5) identify barriers victims of domestic violence encounter when reporting incidents of domestic violence, participating in an investigation or prosecution, and accessing services; new text end new text begin (6) recommend standard policies and practices to reduce the barriers victims of domestic violence encounter; new text end new text begin (7) identify crimes that frequently occur in conjunction with incidents of domestic violence, such as property damage and theft, and make recommendations regarding investigating, documenting, and prosecuting those offenses; new text end new text begin (8) identify conditions, such as traumatic brain injuries, that frequently result from repeated incidents of domestic violence and recommend policies and procedures for working with victims and witnesses who may be suffering from those conditions; new text end new text begin (9) make recommendations for public awareness campaigns to improve the ability of the general public to identify signs of domestic violence and properly report observations; new text end new text begin (10) review practices in Minnesota and other jurisdictions regarding the use of specialty courts or dedicated calendars to address cases involving domestic violence and family law to determine if dedicated courts improve outcomes for victims, reduce recidivism, increase consistency, or have any other benefits; new text end new text begin (11) review current practices related to the involvement of victim advocates; new text end new text begin (12) make recommendations for best practices related to supporting victims of domestic violence through the use of victim advocates, including identifying the appropriate scope of services, recommending the point of initial engagement, suggesting the appropriate frequency of contacts, and making other recommendations related to improving the quality and consistency of contacts; new text end new text begin (13) review prosecutorial policies adopted under Minnesota Statutes, section 611A.0311, and make recommendations for updates to those policies; new text end new text begin (14) identify appropriate data that prosecutors should collect and report related to cases involving domestic violence to ensure consistency and transparency in the prosecution of cases involving domestic violence and the appropriate protection and support of victims and witnesses; new text end new text begin (15) review existing data to assess the regularity of cases in which multiple parties are arrested following an incident of domestic violence and make recommendations related to whether arrests should be limited to the predominant aggressor; and new text end new text begin (16) evaluate public health policies to encourage the prevention of domestic violence. new text end new text begin (d) The task force may consider additional information, request presentations or contributions from any other organization or person, and consider other issues consistent with the purpose of the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15, 2027, the task force must submit a preliminary report to the chairs, cochairs, and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety that includes the model policy and recommendations for the training described in subdivision 4, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2028, the task force must submit a final report to the chairs, cochairs, and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety on the work of the task force, including any recommendations for legislation or funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting its final report under subdivision 5. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin TASK FORCE ON STANDARDIZED IDENTIFICATION FOR EMERGENCY RESPONDERS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Task Force on Standardized Identification for Emergency Responders is established to develop a plan to create a standard form of identification for use by emergency responders in the state and to make policy and funding recommendations to the legislature. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of public safety, or a designee; new text end new text begin (2) the chief of the Minnesota State Patrol, or a designee; new text end new text begin (3) the state fire marshal, or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension, or a designee; new text end new text begin (5) the director of Driver and Vehicle Services, or a designee; new text end new text begin (6) the director of the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training, or a designee; new text end new text begin (7) the director of the Minnesota Office of Emergency Medical Services, or a designee; new text end new text begin (8) the chair of the Metropolitan Airports Commission, or a designee; new text end new text begin (9) a representative from the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (10) a representative from the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (11) a representative from the Minnesota Police and Peace Officers Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (12) a representative from the Minnesota State Fire Chiefs Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (13) a representative from the Minnesota Professional Fire Fighters Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (14) a representative from the Minnesota State Fire Department Association, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; new text end new text begin (15) a representative from Law Enforcement Labor Services, appointed by the president of the association's board of directors; and new text end new text begin (16) one member with experience working as an employee organization representative representing emergency medical service providers, appointed by an employee organization representing emergency medical service providers. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments must be made no later than July 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Members must serve without compensation. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority or until the task force expires. Vacancies must be filled by the appointing authority consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Officers; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee must convene the first meeting of the task force by August 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) At the first meeting, the members of the task force must elect a chair and may elect other officers as the members deem necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force must meet monthly or as determined by the chair. The task force must meet frequently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. new text end new text begin (d) Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must design a standardized identification for emergency responders in the state and prepare a plan to implement mandatory use of a standardized identification by emergency responders and their employers. new text end new text begin (b) The design for the standardized identification must include: new text end new text begin (1) a photograph of the emergency responder; new text end new text begin (2) the name of the emergency responder; new text end new text begin (3) a physical description of the emergency responder; new text end new text begin (4) a clear indication of whether the emergency responder is a peace officer, firefighter, emergency medical services provider, or other type of emergency responder; and new text end new text begin (5) information about the emergency responder's certifications and areas of expertise or a scannable code that provides access to that information. new text end new text begin (c) The task force may require that other information be included on the standardized identification, including but not limited to the name of an employer and a license number. new text end new text begin (d) The task force may recommend that the standardized identification be in the form of a physical card, an electronic document, or both. new text end new text begin (e) The task force must consider whether the state should issue the standardized identification or establish standards and requirements for identification issued by local units of government and other employers. new text end new text begin (f) At a minimum, the plan to implement mandatory use of a standardized identification by emergency responders must: new text end new text begin (1) identify a schedule for issuing identification to current and future emergency responders; new text end new text begin (2) make recommendations regarding application procedures, including developing a procedure to verify the identity of a recipient; new text end new text begin (3) identify data that must be shared in order to create a standardized identification and propose any legislative changes necessary to allow such information to be shared; new text end new text begin (4) make recommendations regarding renewal of a standardized identification; new text end new text begin (5) make recommendations regarding updating information for emergency responders; new text end new text begin (6) make recommendations for policies and procedures to address situations when a person's license or other authorization is suspended, revoked, or canceled; and new text end new text begin (7) make recommendations regarding the collection, destruction, deletion, or other invalidation of a standardized identification when a person no longer works as an emergency responder. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the task force must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety on the work of the task force including any recommendations for legislation or funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting the report required under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin TASK FORCE TO ESTABLISH A STATEWIDE NETWORK FUNDING FOR PUBLIC SAFETY RADIO COMMUNICATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Task Force to Establish a Statewide Network Funding for Public Safety Radio Communications Infrastructure is established to evaluate and make recommendations regarding transitioning the Allied Radio Matrix for Emergency Response (ARMER) network and related interoperable communications to a statewide, state-funded framework. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) one member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house; new text end new text begin (2) one member of the house of representatives, appointed by the leader of the Democratic-Farmer-Labor caucus; new text end new text begin (3) one member of the senate, appointed by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (4) one member of the senate, appointed by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (5) two county commissioners appointed by the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (6) one member from a greater Minnesota county with ARMER expertise, appointed by the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (7) one member from a metro Minnesota county with ARMER expertise, appointed by the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (8) three members from the telecommunications industry representing wireless, cable, and telephone; appointed by the respective trade organizations; new text end new text begin (9) one representative from the city of Minneapolis, appointed by the Minneapolis City Council; new text end new text begin (10) one representative from the city of St. Cloud, appointed by the St. Cloud City Council; new text end new text begin (11) one peace officer, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), appointed by the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association; new text end new text begin (12) one peace officer, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), appointed by the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association; new text end new text begin (13) the commissioner of public safety, or designee; new text end new text begin (14) the commissioner of transportation, or designee; new text end new text begin (15) a member from the Department of Transportation Office of Statewide Radio; new text end new text begin (16) the executive director of the Metropolitan Emergency Services Board; new text end new text begin (17) the executive director of the Statewide Emergency Communications Board; and new text end new text begin (18) the Statewide Interoperability Coordinator (SWIC) for the State of Minnesota as designated by the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments must be made by July 1, 2026. Appointments made by an agency or commissioner may also be made by a designee. new text end new text begin (c) Members of the task force serve without compensation. new text end new text begin (d) Members of the task force serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority or until the task force expires. Vacancies shall be filled by the appointing authority consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Officers; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety shall convene the first meeting of the task force no later than August 1, 2026, and shall provide meeting space and administrative assistance as necessary for the task force to conduct its work. new text end new text begin (b) At its first meeting the task force must elect a chair from the members listed in subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (5) to (18). The task force may elect a vice-chair and other officers as necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force shall meet at least monthly or upon the call of the chair. The task force shall meet sufficiently enough to accomplish the tasks identified in this section. Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. The task force may meet by telephone or interactive technology consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 13D.015. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must make findings and recommendations on: new text end new text begin (1) transitioning to a statewide, state-funded ARMER network infrastructure and achieving interoperability standards; new text end new text begin (2) a dedicated revenue source to ensure the statewide ARMER infrastructure and equipment is maintained, stable, and up-to-date. The task force is encouraged to evaluate: surcharges on telecommunications, public safety related fees, federal grants and matching funds, revenue from state asset forfeitures designated for public safety purposes, and other revenue sources deemed appropriate; new text end new text begin (3) the roles of Minnesota Department of Transportation Office of Statewide Radio, Department of Public Safety, and Statewide Emergency Communications Board; new text end new text begin (4) statewide performance metrics; and new text end new text begin (5) any other related issues necessary to ensure a sustainable, statewide public safety communications system. new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Public Safety, Department of Transportation, the Statewide Emergency Communications Board, regional emergency communications or services boards, and local ARMER infrastructure owners must provide relevant data and research to the task force to facilitate the task force's work. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin The task force must submit a report to the chairs, cochairs, and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over ARMER funding by February 15, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting its final report under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Funding. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety may request funds through the Statewide Emergency Communications Board to support the work of the task force. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin MINNESOTA CLEARANCE GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "nonfatal shooting clearance rate" means the rate at which a law enforcement agency cleared by arrest or cleared by exceptional means a nonfatal shooting offense. For purposes of this definition: new text end new text begin (1) "cleared by arrest" means that a law enforcement agency has arrested at least one person as an offender, charged the person with the commission of an offense, and referred the person to the court for prosecution; and new text end new text begin (2) "cleared by exceptional means" means that a law enforcement agency has identified at least one person as an offender; gathered enough evidence to support an arrest, charge the person, and refer the person to the court for prosecution; identified the person's exact location for the person to be taken into custody immediately; and encountered a circumstance outside the control of the law enforcement agency that prohibits the agency from arresting, charging, and referring the person for prosecution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program establishment; purpose. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must establish the Minnesota clearance grant program to award grants to law enforcement agencies to reduce violent crime by increasing the solve rate of crimes that involve the nonfatal shooting of a firearm. The purpose of the program is to improve law enforcement strategies and initiatives aimed at increasing nonfatal shooting clearance rates, engagement, and support for victims of violent crime. The program recognizes that nonfatal shooting offenses often involve multiple jurisdictions and encourages interagency cooperative efforts to maximize information sharing, resource sharing, and expertise. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application; grant awards. new text end new text begin (a) Applicants must submit an application in the form and manner established by the commissioner. In awarding a grant, the commissioner must give priority to a law enforcement agency: new text end new text begin (1) that develops a plan to partner with other law enforcement agencies to maximize interagency information sharing, resource sharing, and expertise; new text end new text begin (2) that demonstrates a commitment to working with other government agencies to improve clearance rates; and new text end new text begin (3) that details a process for evaluating the effectiveness of both investigators and investigative units, including but not limited to the development of specific goals and performance metrics. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must distribute 50 percent of the funding appropriated for grants under this section to applicants from outside the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) Distribution of state money or technical assistance are by contractual arrangement between the commissioner and each recipient law enforcement agency. Terms of the contract are negotiable each year. The state auditor must periodically audit all law enforcement agencies receiving state grants. Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement agency from receiving federal or local grants if grants become available. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Use of grants. new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency awarded a grant under this section must use the grant award: new text end new text begin (1) to improve investigatory resources, including but not limited to the hiring of personnel assigned to investigate nonfatal shooting crimes or collect, process, and test forensic evidence; new text end new text begin (2) for overtime for investigators and support staff; new text end new text begin (3) to develop evidence-based policies, procedures, and training; new text end new text begin (4) for technical assistance; new text end new text begin (5) for law enforcement equipment or technology, including but not limited to investigative, evidence-processing, or forensic-testing equipment or technology; new text end new text begin (6) for information systems, with prioritization for projects that would improve data integration and the ability to share information across and between law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys' offices, and crime laboratories; new text end new text begin (7) for hiring and retention of victim-witness coordinators; and new text end new text begin (8) to partner with hospital-based violence intervention programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency that receives a grant under this section must submit biannually to the commissioner a report on activities carried out to reduce violent crime and improve nonfatal shooting clearance rates during the preceding fiscal year, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) the number of investigations initiated, the number of nonfatal shootings cleared, the demographics of victims and offenders, and the impact on the nonfatal shooting clearance rates in the jurisdiction where investigations were initiated; new text end new text begin (2) the number of personnel hired or assigned to investigate nonfatal shootings, disaggregated between sworn law enforcement officers and civilian or unsworn professional staff; new text end new text begin (3) the number of personnel hired or assigned to collect, process, and test forensic evidence; new text end new text begin (4) the number of personnel hired or assigned to provide victim services; new text end new text begin (5) the description of any training developed or implemented; new text end new text begin (6) the description of any new technology purchased or acquired; new text end new text begin (7) how grant-funded activities have impacted clearance rates; and new text end new text begin (8) the record management system, or equivalent, used to collect case information and the system's ability to integrate with the record management systems of other agencies, prosecuting attorney's offices, and crime laboratories. new text end ARTICLE 3 CORRECTIONS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.27, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin "Private business" means an entity organized under the laws of this state or a foreign jurisdiction, but does not include a governmental unit. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.27, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Reports and financial statements. new text begin (a) new text end MINNCOR shall include its full costs for inmate wages and the money it receives from the department for inmate confinement costs in its annual financial statements and reports. In addition, MINNCOR shall disclose in its annual reportnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end how the money it receives from the department for inmate confinement costs affects its profitabilitynew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) a calculation of the profitability of each contract MINNCOR has with private businesses consistent with the requirements set forth in subdivision 7, paragraph (a)new text end . new text begin (b) MINNCOR must post on the agency's public-facing website the Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program wage for each region of the state where MINNCOR is contracting with a private business. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.27, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Interactions with private businesses. new text begin (a) MINNCOR must participate in the United States Bureau of Justice Assistance's Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program (PIECP). When implementing the PIECP, MINNCOR must: new text end new text begin (1) calculate the PIECP wage, which is the prevailing wage rate for each region of the state where MINNCOR is contracting with a private business based on the Department of Employment and Economic Development's wage survey, and set the rate at the 50th percentile for each region; new text end new text begin (2) separately track wages paid to inmates at either the PIECP wage or the non-PIECP wage, which is a wage rate that is exempt from the PIECP's prevailing wage requirement; new text end new text begin (3) not use a blended wage rate that combines PIECP wages and non-PIECP wages when assessing and evaluating contract costs, profitability, and potential partnerships with private businesses; and new text end new text begin (4) classify and document each inmate's MINNCOR position as either a PIECP wage position or a non-PIECP wage position. new text end new text begin (b) MINNCOR must not subsidize private businesses, including but not limited to using the costs of confinement to offset contract costs, to manipulate a contract's profitability calculation, or to otherwise reduce a private business' operating expenses. new text end new text begin (c) MINNCOR must account for all labor, manufacturing, general, and administrative costs when establishing standard contract rates. new text end new text begin (d) MINNCOR must recapture the fair market value for use of Department of Corrections floor space and storage that is dedicated to a private business. new text end new text begin (e) When entering into a contract and calculating labor costs, MINNCOR must use the prevailing wage rate for the industry in which the inmates are working as determined by the Department of Employment and Economic Development. new text end new text begin (f) Before entering a contract with MINNCOR, a private business must disclose to MINNCOR the total number of full-time equivalent positions the private business employs and must update that number at least quarterly during the contract term. The number of positions filled by incarcerated persons under a contract with the private business may not exceed four incarcerated persons for every one full-time equivalent employee of the private business. new text end deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (g) new text end MINNCOR shall use revenue contracts or purchase orders on forms approved by the Department of Administration whenever it allows private businesses to use inmate labor. MINNCOR shall determine whether to use a revenue contract or a purchase order according to criteria that the Department of Corrections has approved having taken into account the recommendations of the legislative auditor contained in its 2009 report on MINNCOR. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end MINNCOR shall develop a uniform method to report sales and expenditure data related to individual labor arrangements with private businesses. MINNCOR shall review the data annually to assess how the arrangements, both individually and collectively, affect MINNCOR achieving its goals of high inmate participation in industry and profitability. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.27, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Displacement of private sector workers; verification. new text end new text begin The commissioner of employment and economic development must verify that each PIECP contract MINNCOR enters will not result in the displacement of employed private sector workers in the geographic region where MINNCOR facilities are located and the geographic region where the private business is located. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This article is effective July 1, 2026. The requirements of this article apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after that date. Contracts entered into before July 1, 2026, are not subject to this article and may continue under existing terms until expiration. new text end ARTICLE 4 GENERAL CRIMINAL PROVISIONS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 609.2231, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Firefighters and deleted text begin emergencydeleted text end medical personnel. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), whoever physically assaults any of the following persons is guilty of a gross misdemeanor: (1) either: (i) a member of a municipal or volunteer fire department in the performance of the member's duties; or (ii) a member of an emergency medical services personnel unit in the performance of the member's duties; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) a physician, nurse, or other person providing health care services in a hospital emergency departmentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) a security guard, as defined in section 326.32, subdivision 13, providing services in a hospital or clinic. new text end (b) Whoever physically assaults a person described in paragraph (a), is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $6,000, or both, if the assault inflicts demonstrable bodily harm. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.352, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. As used in this section: (a) "child" means a person 15 years of age or youngernew text begin , except as the term is used in subdivision 2dnew text end ; new text begin (b) "current or recent position of authority" has the meaning given in section 609.341, subdivision 10; new text end new text begin (c) "pattern" means two or more instances of conduct; new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "sexual conduct" means sexual contact of the individual's primary genital area, sexual penetration as defined in section 609.341, or sexual performance as defined in section 617.246; and deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "solicit" means commanding, entreating, or attempting to persuade a specific person in person, by telephone, by letter, or by computerized or other electronic means. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.352, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2c. new text end new text begin Grooming. new text end new text begin A person 18 years of age or older who knowingly engages in a pattern of conduct that seduces, solicits, lures, or entices, or attempts to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice, a child to engage or participate in unlawful sexual conduct that is for the purpose of sexual gratification or arousal of the victim, the accused, or another individual is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.352, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2d. new text end new text begin School violations; positions of authority. new text end new text begin A person, while in a current or recent position of authority over a child as an employee, a volunteer, or an independent contractor of the public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school where the child is or was enrolled, who commits any of the acts prohibited under subdivisions 2 to 2c is guilty of a felony if: new text end new text begin (1) the child is less than 18 years of age; and new text end new text begin (2) the person is more than 36 months older than the child. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.352, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Penalty. A person convicted under subdivision 2 deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end 2anew text begin , 2c, or 2dnew text end is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years, or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.4751, is amended to read: 609.4751 IMPERSONATING A PEACE OFFICER. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Misdemeanordeleted text end new text begin Intent to misleadnew text end . Whoever falsely impersonates a peace officer with intent to mislead another into believing that the impersonator is actually an officer is guilty of a deleted text begin misdemeanordeleted text end new text begin felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or bothnew text end . Subd. 2. deleted text begin Gross misdemeanordeleted text end new text begin Buildings; vehiclesnew text end . Whoever violates subdivision 1 while committing any of the following acts is guilty of a deleted text begin gross misdemeanordeleted text end new text begin felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or bothnew text end : (1) gaining access to a public building or government facility that is not open to the public; (2) without legal authority, directing or ordering another person to act or refrain from acting; (3) violating section 169.64, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, or the siren provisions of section 169.68; or (4) operating a motor vehicle deleted text begin markeddeleted text end : (i) new text begin marked new text end with the word or words "police," "patrolman," "sheriff," "deputy," "trooper," "state patrol," "conservation officer," "agent," or "marshal"; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (ii) new text begin marked new text end with any lettering, marking, or insignia, or colorable imitation thereof, including, but not limited to, stars, badges, or shields identifying the vehicle as a law enforcement vehicle, and which a reasonable person would believe is a law enforcement vehicle governed under section 169.98, subdivision 1deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (iii) displaying equipment commonly attached to law enforcement vehicles, or a facsimile of such equipment, in a manner that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the motor vehicle is a law enforcement vehicle governed under section 169.98, subdivision 1. new text end Subd. 3. deleted text begin Felonydeleted text end new text begin Previous violation; possession of a firearmnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end Whoever violates this section within five years of a previous violation of this section is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin twodeleted text end new text begin tennew text end years or to payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $4,000deleted text end new text begin $20,000new text end , or both. new text begin (b) Whoever violates this section while in possession of a firearm is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Crime committed while impersonating an officer; enhanced penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A person who commits a crime other than a violation of this section while falsely impersonating a peace officer with intent to mislead another into believing that the impersonator is actually an officer may be sentenced as follows: new text end new text begin (1) if the crime committed is a misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor; new text end new text begin (2) if the crime committed is a gross misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $15,000, or both; and new text end new text begin (3) if the crime committed is a felony, the statutory maximum for the crime is five years longer than the statutory maximum for the underlying crime. new text end new text begin (b) An enhanced penalty imposed under this subdivision does not preclude prosecution under any other provision of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duty to identify. new text end new text begin (a) A law enforcement officer must identify the law enforcement agency or other entity employing the individual, the individual's last name, and the individual's identification number if the individual is: new text end new text begin (1) licensed by the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training; new text end new text begin (2) an officer employed by a federally recognized Tribe, as defined in United States Code, title 25, section 450b(e); new text end new text begin (3) a peace officer of a state adjoining Minnesota exercising authority pursuant to section 626.77; or new text end new text begin (4) an officer from another jurisdiction providing mutual assistance under the terms of an emergency management assistance compact entered into pursuant to section 192.89 or a mutual aid arrangement or cooperative agreement entered into pursuant to section 12.21. new text end new text begin (b) A law enforcement officer satisfies the requirements in paragraph (a) if: new text end new text begin (1) the officer wears a uniform that clearly identifies the law enforcement agency or other entity employing the officer and displays any combination of a badge, nameplate, identification patch, or other label that clearly identifies the officer's last name and identification number; new text end new text begin (2) the officer wears body armor or a protective suit for the purposes of crowd control or participation as a member of a special weapons and tactics team, and displays any combination of a badge, nameplate, identification patch, or other label that clearly identifies the law enforcement agency or other entity employing the officer and the officer's identification number; or new text end new text begin (3) upon request, the officer states the required information or provides a card that includes the required information. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this subdivision requires an undercover peace officer to reveal the undercover peace officer's identity unless the undercover peace officer is detaining a person, arresting a person, or executing a warrant. new text end new text begin (d) Failure by a peace officer to comply with the requirements of this subdivision does not make an arrest unlawful and must not be the basis to suppress any evidence identified or seized following an arrest. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.52, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Enhanced deleted text begin penaltydeleted text end new text begin penalties; risk of harm; vulnerable adultnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end If a violation of this section creates a reasonably foreseeable risk of bodily harm to another, the penalties described in subdivision 3 are enhanced as follows: (1) if the penalty is a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $5,000, or both; and (2) if the penalty is a felony, the statutory maximum sentence for the offense is 50 percent longer than for the underlying crime. new text begin (b) If a person violates this section knowing or having reason to know that the victim of the offense is a vulnerable adult as defined in section 609.232, subdivision 11, the penalties described in subdivision 3 are enhanced as follows: new text end new text begin (1) if the penalty is a misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor; new text end new text begin (2) if the penalty is a gross misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $5,000, or both; and new text end new text begin (3) if the penalty is a felony, the statutory maximum sentence for the offense is 25 percent longer than for the underlying crime. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end ARTICLE 5 DOMESTIC VIOLENCE POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 299C.80, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Reporting. (a) As provided for in chapter 13, the superintendent must make all inactive investigative data for officer-involved death investigations that are public under section 13.82, subdivision 7, or other applicable law available on the bureau's website within 30 days of the case becoming inactive as defined in section 13.82, subdivision 7, except any video that does not record, describe, or otherwise document actions and circumstances surrounding the officer-involved death. (b) By February 1 of each year, the superintendent shall report to the commissioner, the governor, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety finance and policy the following information about the unit: the number of investigations initiated; new text begin the number of incidents that began with a law enforcement response to a situation involving suspected or alleged domestic abuse, as defined in section 626.5537, subdivision 1; new text end the number of incidents investigated; the outcomes or current status of each investigation; the charging decisions made by the prosecuting authority of incidents investigated by the unit; the number of plea agreements reached in incidents investigated by the unit; and any other information relevant to the unit's mission. (c) Nothing in this subdivision modifies the requirements of chapter 13 or the classification of data. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.0311, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) "Domestic abuse" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 2. (b) "Domestic abuse case" means a prosecution for: (1) a crime that involves domestic abuse; (2) violation of a condition of release following an arrest for a crime that involves domestic abuse; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) violation of a domestic abuse order for protectiondeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin issued pursuant to section 518B.01;new text end new text begin (4) violation of a harassment restraining order issued pursuant to section 609.748 committed against a family or household member by a family or household member; new text end new text begin (5) harassment or stalking within the meaning of section 609.749 committed against a family or household member by a family or household member; or new text end new text begin (6) violation of a domestic abuse no contact order issued pursuant to section 629.75. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [626.5537] DOMESTIC ABUSE; REPORTING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Domestic abuse" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), and also includes the following, if committed against a family or household member by a family or household member: new text end new text begin (1) violation of an order for protection within the meaning of section 518B.01, subdivision 14; new text end new text begin (2) violation of a harassment restraining order within the meaning of section 609.748, subdivision 6; new text end new text begin (3) harassment or stalking within the meaning of section 609.749; and new text end new text begin (4) violation of a domestic abuse no contact order within the meaning of section 629.75, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) "Family or household member" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Collection of information; reporting. new text end new text begin The head of a local law enforcement agency or state law enforcement department that employs peace officers, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), must report every incident a peace officer reasonably believes, or a victim alleges, constitutes an act of domestic abuse to the commissioner of public safety by January 15 each year. The superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension must adopt a reporting form to be used by law enforcement agencies in making the reports required under this section. The reports must include all of the following for each incident: new text end new text begin (1) the date of the incident; new text end new text begin (2) the location of the incident; new text end new text begin (3) the crime suspected to have been committed; new text end new text begin (4) whether the response began as a call for service alleging an act of domestic abuse; new text end new text begin (5) the perceived genders of the alleged victim and suspect; new text end new text begin (6) the perceived races of the alleged victim and suspect; new text end new text begin (7) whether a suspect was arrested at the time of the incident; new text end new text begin (8) whether a suspect was arrested at a later date and, if so, the time between the incident and the arrest; new text end new text begin (9) whether the alleged victim was arrested at the time of the incident and, if so, any alleged crime that formed the basis for the arrest; new text end new text begin (10) whether the alleged offender possessed, or was reported to possess, a firearm at the time of the incident; new text end new text begin (11) whether the case was referred for prosecution; new text end new text begin (12) whether the determination that the incident constituted an act of domestic abuse was based on an officer's reasonable belief, the victim's allegation, or both; and new text end new text begin (13) any additional information the superintendent deems necessary for the acquisition of accurate and relevant data. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Annual report. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must summarize and analyze the information received under subdivision 2 and provide an annual report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety. The annual report may be included in the department's annual uniform crime report. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.341, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Arrestnew text begin ; referral for prosecutionnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding section 629.34 or any other law or rule, a peace officer may arrest a person anywhere without a warrant, including at the person's residence, if the peace officer has probable cause to believe that within the preceding deleted text begin 72 hoursdeleted text end new text begin 14 daysnew text end , exclusive of the day probable cause was established, the person has committed nonfelony domestic abuse, as defined in section 518B.01, subdivision 2. The arrest may be made even though the assault did not take place in the presence of the peace officer. new text begin (b) If a peace officer has probable cause to believe that a person has committed an act that constitutes harassment or stalking in violation of section 609.749; domestic abuse as defined in section 518B.01, subdivision 2; violation of an order for protection as described in section 518B.01, subdivision 14; or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order as described in section 629.75 and the person was not arrested, the peace officer should seek a warrant from a judge for the person's arrest without undue delay. A warrant issued under this paragraph is not subject to the limitations described in section 629.31. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.341, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Report required. new text begin (a) new text end Whenever a peace officer investigates an allegation that deleted text begin an incident described in subdivision 1 has occurred, whether or not an arrest is made,deleted text end new text begin a person has committed a qualified domestic violence-related offense and the victim is a family or household member,new text end the officer shall make a written police report of the alleged incidentnew text begin regardless of whether an arrest is madenew text end . The report must contain at least the following information: the name, address and telephone number of the victim, if provided by the victim, a statement as to whether an arrest occurred, the name of the arrested person, and a brief summary of the incident. Data that identify a victim who has made a request under section 13.82, subdivision 17, paragraph (d), and that are private data under that subdivision, shall be private in the report required by this section. A copy of this report must be provided upon request, at no cost, to the victim of domestic abuse, the victim's attorney, or organizations designated by the Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety that are providing services to victims of domestic abuse. The officer shall submit the report to the officer's supervisor or other person to whom the employer's rules or policies require reports of similar allegations of criminal activity to be made. new text begin (b) As used in this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) "qualified domestic violence-related offense" has the meaning given in section 609.02, subdivision 16; and new text end new text begin (2) "family or household member" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.72, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Detention in lieu of citation; release. (a) Notwithstanding any other law or rule, an arresting officer may not issue a citation in lieu of arrest and detention to an individual charged with harassing or stalking, domestic abuse, violation of an order for protection, or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order. (b) Notwithstanding any other law or rule, an individual who is arrested on a charge of harassing or stalking any person, domestic abuse, violation of an order for protection, or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order, must be brought to the police station or county jail. new text begin An individual who is arrested on a charge of violation of an order for protection or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order must be detained until the person's first court appearance as required under sections 518B.01, subdivision 14, paragraph (e), and 629.75, subdivision 3. new text end The officer in charge of the police station or the county sheriff in charge of the jail shall issue a citation in lieu of continued detention new text begin for a charge of harassing or stalking any person or for domestic abuse new text end unless it reasonably appears to the officer or sheriff that release of the person deleted text begin (1)deleted text end poses a threat to the alleged victim or another family or household member, deleted text begin (2)deleted text end poses a threat to public safety, or deleted text begin (3)deleted text end involves a substantial likelihood the arrested person will fail to appear at subsequent proceedings.new text begin In determining if the person poses a threat to the alleged victim or another family or household member, the officer in charge of the police station or the county sheriff in charge of the jail must consider the person's history of domestic violence, including but not limited to:new text end new text begin (1) any previous arrest or conviction for harassing or stalking any person, domestic abuse, violation of an order for protection, or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order; new text end new text begin (2) any order for protection, harassment restraining order, or domestic abuse no contact order in which the person was identified as the subject of the order; and new text end new text begin (3) any pending petitions for an order for protection or a harassment restraining order in which the person is a respondent. new text end (c) If the arrested person is not issued a citation by the officer in charge of the police station or the county sheriff, the arrested person must be brought before the nearest available judge of the district court in the county in which the alleged harassing or stalking, domestic abuse, violation of an order for protection, or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order took place without unnecessary delay as provided by court rule. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.72, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Judicial review; release; bail. (a) The judge before whom the arrested person is brought shall review the facts surrounding the arrest and detention of a person arrested for domestic abuse, harassing or stalking, violation of an order for protection, or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order. The prosecutor or prosecutor's designee shall present relevant information involving the victim's or the victim's family's account of the alleged crime to the judge to be considered in determining the arrested person's release.new text begin If the person was arrested for violation of an order for protection or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order, the prosecutor or prosecutor's designee must describe the allegations in the underlying petition or criminal case. The prosecutor or prosecutor's designee may present information and bail recommendations in person or by filing it with the court through the appropriate electronic filing system.new text end In making a decision concerning pretrial release conditions of a person arrested for domestic abuse, harassing or stalking, violation of an order for protection, or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order, the judge shall review the facts of the arrest and detention of the personnew text begin and the relevant information presented or filed by the prosecutor or prosecutor's designeenew text end and determine whetherdeleted text begin : (1)deleted text end release of the person poses a threat to the alleged victim, another family or household member, or public safetydeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin ,new text end or deleted text begin (2)deleted text end there is a substantial likelihood the person will fail to appear at subsequent proceedings. Before releasing a person arrested for or charged with a crime of domestic abuse, harassing or stalking, violation of an order for protection, or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order, the judge shall make findings on the record, to the extent possible, concerning the determination made in accordance with the factors specified in deleted text begin clauses (1) and (2)deleted text end new text begin this paragraphnew text end .new text begin The findings should describe whether the person:new text end new text begin (1) was previously arrested for, or convicted of, harassing or stalking any person, domestic abuse, violation of an order for protection, or violation of a domestic abuse no contact order; new text end new text begin (2) has ever been the subject of an order for protection, harassment restraining order, or domestic abuse no contact order and, if so, the nature of the allegations or charges that gave rise to the order; and new text end new text begin (3) is the respondent in any pending petition for an order for protection or harassment restraining order and, if so, the nature of the allegations in any petition. new text end (b) The judge may impose conditions of release or bail, or both, on the person to protect the alleged victim or other family or household members and to ensure the appearance of the person at subsequent proceedings. These conditions may include an order: (1) enjoining the person from threatening to commit or committing acts of domestic abuse or harassing or stalking against the alleged victim or other family or household members or from violating an order for protection or a domestic abuse no contact order; (2) prohibiting the person from harassing, annoying, telephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating with the alleged victim, either directly or indirectly; (3) directing the person to vacate or stay away from the home of the alleged victim and to stay away from any other location where the alleged victim is likely to be; (4) prohibiting the person from possessing a firearm or other weapon specified by the court; (5) prohibiting the person from possessing or consuming alcohol or controlled substances; and (6) specifying any other matter required to protect the safety of the alleged victim and to ensure the appearance of the person at subsequent proceedings. (c) If conditions of release are imposed, the judge shall issue a written order for conditional release. The court administrator shall immediately distribute a copy of the order for conditional release to the agency having custody of the arrested person and shall provide the agency having custody of the arrested person with any available information on the location of the victim in a manner that protects the victim's safety. Either the court or its designee or the agency having custody of the arrested person shall serve upon the defendant a copy of the order. Failure to serve the arrested person with a copy of the order for conditional release does not invalidate the conditions of release. (d) If the judge imposes as a condition of release a requirement that the person have no contact with the alleged victim, the judge may also, on its own motion or that of the prosecutor or on request of the victim, issue an ex parte temporary restraining order under section 609.748, subdivision 4, or an ex parte temporary order for protection under section 518B.01, subdivision 7. Notwithstanding section 518B.01, subdivision 7, paragraph (b), or 609.748, subdivision 4, paragraph (c), the temporary order is effective until the defendant is convicted or acquitted, or the charge is dismissed, provided that upon request the defendant is entitled to a full hearing on the restraining order under section 609.748, subdivision 5, or on the order for protection under section 518B.01. The hearing must be held within seven days of the defendant's request. Sec. 8. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.72, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end ARTICLE 6 PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER DATA Section 1. new text begin [13.807] PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER DATA; PERSONAL INFORMATION. new text end new text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (b), the personal information of all public safety officers collected, created, or maintained by a government entity is private data on individuals. For purposes of this section, the terms "personal information" and "public safety officer" have the meanings given in section 626.97, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) If the responsible authority or government entity violates this chapter, the remedies and penalties under this chapter are available only if the public safety officer making a claim previously provided written notification to the responsible authority confirming on a form provided by the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety that they are entitled to protection under section 626.97. If the subject of the data is an adult child of a public safety officer who does not reside with the public safety officer, the remedies and penalties under this chapter are available only if the adult child previously provided written notification to the responsible authority confirming their status as the child of a public safety officer. In the case of county records, the form shall be filed with the responsible authority that maintains the personal information for which the public safety officer is seeking protection. A form submitted under this section is private data on individuals. A notice filed under this paragraph expires five years following the date of filing, unless it is renewed prior to the expiration date. new text end new text begin (c) This section shall not apply to personal information contained in: new text end new text begin (1) real property records as defined in section 13.045, subdivision 1, clause (5); new text end new text begin (2) Uniform Commercial Code filings and tax liens maintained by the secretary of state; and new text end new text begin (3) any other records maintained by a government entity evidencing title to, or any lien, judgment, or other encumbrance on, real or personal property. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.5151, is amended to read: 609.5151 DISSEMINATION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION ABOUT deleted text begin LAW ENFORCEMENTdeleted text end new text begin CERTAIN PERSONS INVOLVED IN PUBLIC SAFETYnew text end PROHIBITED; PENALTY. Subdivision 1. Definitions. As used in this section: (1) new text begin "correctional officer" has the meaning given in section 241.026, subdivision 1, paragraph (b);new text end new text begin (2) new text end "family or household member" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 2; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end "law enforcement official" means both peace officers as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1new text begin , paragraph (c)new text end , and persons employed by a law enforcement agencynew text begin as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f)new text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end "personal information" means a home telephone number, personal cell number, personal email address, name of the official's minor child, photographs of the official's minor child, home address, directions to a home, or photographs of a homenew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) "public safety official" means a correctional officer or a law enforcement officialnew text end . Subd. 2. Crime described. (a) It is a misdemeanor for a person to knowingly and without consent make publicly available, including but not limited to through the Internet, personal information about a deleted text begin law enforcementdeleted text end new text begin public safetynew text end official or an official's family or household member, if: (1) the public availability of information poses an imminent and serious threat to the official's safety or the safety of an official's family or household member; and (2) the person making the information publicly available knows or reasonably should know of the imminent and serious threat. (b) new text begin A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.new text end new text begin (c) new text end A person is guilty of a deleted text begin gross misdemeanordeleted text end new text begin felonynew text end if the person violates paragraph (a) and a deleted text begin law enforcementdeleted text end new text begin public safetynew text end official or an official's family or household member suffers great bodily harm or death as a result of the violation. deleted text begin (c) A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [626.97] PERSONAL INFORMATION; DISSEMINATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section and section 626.971, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Correctional officer" has the meaning given in section 241.026, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (c) "Law enforcement support organizations" do not include charitable organizations. new text end new text begin (d) "Peace officer" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (e) "Personal information" does not include publicly available information. Personal information means: new text end new text begin (1) a residential address of a public safety officer; new text end new text begin (2) a residential address of the spouse, domestic partner, or children of a public safety officer; new text end new text begin (3) a nonemployer-issued telephone number or email address of a public safety officer; new text end new text begin (4) the name of any child of a public safety officer; new text end new text begin (5) the name of any child care facility or school that is attended by a child of a public safety officer if combined with an assertion that the named facility or school is attended by the child of a public safety officer; and new text end new text begin (6) data about a public safety officer that is classified as private data on individuals under section 13.43, subdivision 5, including but not limited to the officer's name. new text end new text begin (f) "Public safety officer" means a peace officer, a correctional officer, a former peace officer, or a former correctional officer. new text end new text begin (g) "Publicly available information" means information that is lawfully made available through federal, state, or local government records or information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public through widely distributed media, by a public safety officer, or by a person to whom the public safety officer has disclosed the information, unless the public safety officer has restricted the information to a specific audience. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Dissemination of personal information. new text end new text begin Subject to the exceptions in subdivision 3 and the requirements of section 626.971, no person, business, association, or government entity shall knowingly publicly post, display, publish, sell, or otherwise make available on the Internet the personal information of any public safety officer. Personal information shall be kept in a secure manner to prevent unauthorized access. Personal information may be disseminated pursuant to a specific authorization in law, rule, or with the written consent of the public safety officer. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin Subdivision 2 does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) the dissemination of personal information if the information is relevant to and displayed as part of a news story, commentary, editorial, or other speech on a matter of public concern; new text end new text begin (2) personal information that the public safety officer voluntarily disseminates publicly after August 1, 2026; new text end new text begin (3) the dissemination of personal information made at the request of the public safety officer or that is necessary to effectuate the request of a public safety officer; new text end new text begin (4) a commercial entity using personal information internally, providing access to businesses under common ownership or affiliated by corporate control, or selling or providing data for a transaction or service requested by or concerning the individual whose personal information is being transferred; new text end new text begin (5) a commercial entity providing publicly available information through real-time or near real-time alert services for health or safety purposes; new text end new text begin (6) a commercial entity engaged in the collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, or use of any personal information bearing on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer reporting agency, furnisher, or user that provides information for use in a consumer report, and by a user of a consumer report, but only to the extent that such activity is regulated by and authorized under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, United States Code, title 15, section 1681, et seq.; new text end new text begin (7) a consumer reporting agency subject to the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, United States Code, title 15, section 1681, et seq.; new text end new text begin (8) a commercial entity using personal information collected, processed, sold, or disclosed in compliance with the federal Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, United States Code, title 18, section 2721, et seq.; new text end new text begin (9) a commercial entity using personal information to prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activities, or any illegal activity; preserve the integrity or security of systems; or investigate, report, or prosecute any person responsible for any such action; new text end new text begin (10) a financial institution, affiliate of a financial institution, or data subject to title V of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, United States Code, title 15, section 6801, et seq.; new text end new text begin (11) a covered entity or business associate for purposes of the federal privacy regulations promulgated under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, specifically United States Code, title 42, section 1320d-2 note; new text end new text begin (12) insurance and insurance support organizations; new text end new text begin (13) law enforcement agencies or law enforcement support organizations and vendors that provide data support services to law enforcement agencies; new text end new text begin (14) the collection and sale or licensing of covered information incidental to conducting the activities described in clauses (4) to (13); and new text end new text begin (15) personal information contained in: new text end new text begin (i) real property records as defined in section 13.045, subdivision 1, clause (5); new text end new text begin (ii) uniform commercial code filings and tax liens maintained by the secretary of state; and new text end new text begin (iii) any other records maintained by a government entity evidencing title to, or any lien, judgment, or other encumbrance on, real or personal property. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [626.971] REMOVAL OF PERSONAL INFORMATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Internet dissemination. new text end new text begin If personal information about a public safety officer is publicly posted to the Internet by a person, business, association, or government entity, the public safety officer may submit a sworn affidavit to the person, business, association, or government entity requesting that the publicly posted personal information be removed. The affidavit shall: new text end new text begin (1) state that the individual whose information was disseminated is a public safety officer as defined in section 626.97; new text end new text begin (2) describe with specificity the personal information that the public safety officer seeks to remove; and new text end new text begin (3) state the name of the publication, website, or otherwise identify where the public safety officer's personal information is available to the public. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Removal of personal information; exception. new text end new text begin (a) Upon receipt of an affidavit requesting removal of the personal information of a public safety officer that meets the requirements of subdivision 1, the person, business, association, or government entity shall remove the publicly posted personal information within 30 days. If the person, business, association, or government entity fails to remove the publicly posted personal information within 30 days after an affidavit is submitted, the public safety officer may file a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction seeking a court order compelling compliance, including injunctive and declarative relief. new text end new text begin (b) Paragraph (a) shall not apply to personal information contained in: new text end new text begin (1) real property records as defined in section 13.045, subdivision 1, clause (5); new text end new text begin (2) Uniform Commercial Code filings and tax liens maintained by the secretary of state; and new text end new text begin (3) any other records maintained by a government entity evidencing title to, or any lien, judgment, or other encumbrance on, real or personal property. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalties and damages. new text end new text begin If a person, business, association, or government entity knowingly violates an order granting injunctive or declarative relief, the court issuing the order may award to the public safety officer an amount equal to the actual damages sustained by the public safety officer, and court costs and reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: H1082-5 629.72 BAIL; DOMESTIC ABUSE; HARASSMENT; VIOLATION OF ORDER FOR PROTECTION; OR NO CONTACT ORDER. Subd. 3. Release. If the arrested person is not issued a citation by the officer in charge of the police station or the county sheriff pursuant to subdivision 1, and is not brought before a judge within the time limits prescribed by court rule, the arrested person shall be released by the arresting authorities, and a citation must be issued in lieu of continued detention.